Washington statutes.
RCW 3.42.010

District court commissioners—Appointment—Qualifications—Term of office.

When so authorized by the districting plan, one or more district court commissioners may be appointed in any district by the judges of the district. Each commissioner shall be a registered voter of the county in which the district or a portion thereof is located, and shall hold office at the pleasure of the appointing judges. For purposes of this section, "appointing judge" includes a presiding judge pro tempore fulfilling presiding judge duties for a single judge court pursuant to RCW 3.34.100(2) or 3.34.150(2). Any person appointed as a commissioner authorized to hear or dispose of cases shall be a lawyer who is admitted to the practice of law in the state of Washington or who has passed the qualifying examination for lay judges as provided under RCW 3.34.060.

[ 2022 c 74 s 8; 1984 c 258 s 30; 1980 c 162 s 7; 1961 c 299 s 31.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Severability—1980 c 162: See note following RCW 3.02.010.

District court commissioners

bond: RCW 3.34.090.

oath: RCW 3.34.080.